North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4-28 North Dakota State Wheat Commission [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18]

4-28-01.
Legislative intent. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-28-02.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-28-03.
Wheat commission — Members. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-28-04.
State wheat commission districts. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-28-05.
Wheat commission — Meeting — Expenses — Legal adviser. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-28-06.
Wheat commission — Duties and powers. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-28-07.
Wheat tax levy. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-28-07.1.
Wheat tax levy. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-28-08.
State wheat commission fund — Continuing appropriation. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-28-09.
Penalty. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.